Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 3 Investigations and Hearings

Administrative rules and regulations.

Practice and procedure, Official Compilation of Rules and Regulations of State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Public Service Commission, Chapter 515-2-1.

46-2-50.
Conducting of hearings and investigations generally.

The commission shall conduct hearings and investigations in different parts of the state when, in the opinion of the commission, such hearings and investigations will best serve the interest and convenience of the public.

History.

Ga. L. 1922, p. 143, § 3; Code 1933, § 93-502.

46-2-51.
Prescription by commission of rules of procedure and rules of evidence; promulgation of rules and regulations as to rehearing, reconsideration, and oral argument of orders.

The commission shall prescribe the rules of procedure and the rules for the taking of evidence in all matters that may come before it. In the investigation, preparation, and hearing of cases, the commission shall not be bound by the strict technical rules of pleading and evidence but may exercise such discretion as will facilitate its efforts to ascertain the facts bearing upon the right and justice of the matters before it. When deemed necessary, in all formal cases heard and determined, the commission shall render an opinion setting out the issues involved in the case and its decision, ruling, and findings thereon. The commission is authorized to provide by rule and regulation for the procedure to be observed in the rehearing, reconsideration, and oral argument of all orders entered by the commission.

History.

Ga. L. 1922, p. 143, § 3; Code 1933, § 93-501; Ga. L. 1945, p. 356, § 2.

Law reviews.

For comment on Tamiami Trail Tours, Inc. v. Georgia Pub. Serv. Comm’n,

213 Ga. 418

,

99 S.E.2d 225

(1957), see 20 Ga. B.J. 247 (1957).

46-2-52.
Keeping of records of proceedings on formal investigations; transcribing of testimony.

A full and complete record as provided in paragraph (8) of subsection (a) of Code Section 50-13-13 shall be kept of all proceedings conducted before the commission on any formal investigation; and all testimony shall be transcribed by the official reporter appointed by the commission.

History.

Ga. L. 1922, p. 143, § 4; Code 1933, § 93-503.

46-2-53.
[Reserved] Reports, rate schedules, orders, rules, or regulations of commission as admissible evidence in court proceedings.

History.

Ga. L. 1907, p. 72, § 5; Civil Code 1910, § 2626; Ga. L. 1922, p. 143, § 1; Code 1933, § 93-504; repealed by Ga. L. 2011, p. 994, § 89/HB 24, effective January 1, 2013.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 994, § 89/HB 24 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective January 1, 2013.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 101/HB 24, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that this Act shall apply to any motion made or hearing or trial commenced on or after January 1, 2013.

46-2-54.
Power to issue subpoenas; payments to witnesses; failure or refusal to obey subpoenas.

In making any examination for the purpose of obtaining information pursuant to this title, the commission shall have the power to issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses by such rules as it may prescribe.

Witnesses shall receive for such attendance the same fees and mileage as prescribed by law in civil cases in the superior court. Such compensation shall be ordered paid by the Governor upon presentation of subpoenas and statements as to the number of days served and miles traveled. Such statements shall be sworn to by the witnesses before the clerk of the commission, who shall have the power to administer oaths.

If any person willfully fails or refuses to obey such subpoena, it shall be the duty of the judge of the superior court of any county, upon application of the commission, to issue an attachment for such witness and compel him to attend the meeting of the commission and give his testimony upon such matters as shall be lawfully required by such commission. The court shall have power to punish for contempt as in other cases of refusal to obey the process and order of the court.

History.

Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 125, § 15; Code 1882, § 719o; Civil Code 1895, § 2210; Civil Code 1910, § 2653; Ga. L. 1922, p. 143, § 5; Code 1933, § 93-505.

46-2-55.
Compelling witnesses to testify before commission as to the giving or granting of rebates or as to discriminations in rates and charges by common carriers.

In investigating complaints of violations by common carriers of the laws prohibiting the giving or granting of rebates and prohibiting unjust discrimination in rates and charges, the commission may exercise the power and authority to compel the shipper or consignee, or any officer, agent, or employee of a common carrier to give evidence relating to such complaints. Before any such person shall be compelled to give evidence relating to such complaints, the commission shall make an order that such witness is required by the commission to testify and that he will be exempt thereafter from indictment or prosecution for any transaction about which he is compelled to testify. When such order is made, the witness shall be compelled to give evidence touching such complaints, and he shall be forever free from indictment or prosecution in any court touching the matters about which he is compelled to testify.

History.

Ga. L. 1896, p. 57, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 2636; Ga. L. 1922, p. 143, § 5; Code 1933, § 93-506.

Cross references.

Prohibition against compelled self-incrimination, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. I, Sec. I, Para. XVI.

General prohibition against unjust discrimination in freight-transportation rates by common carriers, §

46-9-52

.

46-2-56.
Compelling witnesses to testify against common carriers or any other person in court.

If a witness is exempted from indictment or prosecution as provided in Code Section 46-2-55, he may also be compelled to give evidence in any action or prosecution instituted in any of the courts of this state against any common carrier or against any other person on account of the transactions about which he is compelled to testify before the commission.

History.

Ga. L. 1896, p. 57, § 2; Civil Code 1910, § 2637; Ga. L. 1922, p. 143, § 5; Code 1933, § 93-507.

46-2-57.
Obtaining of discovery by employees and agents of commission; petitions by commission for necessary orders, injunctions, and subpoenas; extension of suspension period by Superior Court of Fulton County; time of hearing of applications and petitions from commission.

In any case pending before it, the commission, in addition to its now existing authority to do so, is authorized to issue an order permitting its employees and agents to take depositions and otherwise obtain discovery of any matter, not privileged, which is relevant to the subject matter involved in the investigation, proceeding, or petition before the commission, in the same manner prescribed in Chapter 11 of Title 9 for discovery in civil actions. In any case involving an application of a gas company to establish just and reasonable rates pursuant to Code Section 46-2-23.1 or 46-4-154, intervenors who are granted party status pursuant to Code Section 46-2-59, as well as the gas company subject to the particular proceeding, shall have all discovery rights available under Chapter 11 of Title 9.

The commission, its agents and employees as directed by the commission, and intervenors and gas companies which are granted discovery rights under subsection (a) of this Code section are authorized to petition the Superior Court of Fulton County for all orders, injunctions, and subpoenas necessary to carry out the provisions of this Code section which would otherwise be authorized or necessary under Chapter 11 of Title 9; and the judges and clerks of the court are authorized to issue all such orders, injunctions, and subpoenas and to take all other actions necessary to carry out this Code section which would otherwise be authorized or necessary under Chapter 11 of Title 9.

In addition to the sanctions which may be imposed under Code Section 9-11-37, the Superior Court of Fulton County is further authorized to extend the period of suspension of the operation of any new schedules and defer the use of such rates, charges, classifications, or service beyond the time authorized by Code Section 46-2-25, if the court, upon application of the commission, determines that the failure of any regulated utility to comply with a discovery request of the commission, its agents, or its employees is unreasonable and requires such extension. No such extension of the period of suspension shall be considered by the court unless the utility has failed completely to respond to a valid deposition or discovery request.

Any application or petition made by the commission, its agents, or its employees pursuant to this Code section shall be heard within 20 days of the filing of the application or petition, irrespective of whether any response to the application or petition has previously been made, and shall be disposed of promptly.

History.

Ga. L. 1922, p. 145, § 5; Code 1933, § 93-508; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1084, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 798, § 3.

Law reviews.

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this section, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 264 (1997).

46-2-58.
Conducting of hearings by hearing officers.

The commission shall employ one or more hearing officers to perform the duties set forth in this Code section. Hearing officers shall be persons qualified by knowledge and experience to conduct hearings on utility and transportation matters. In addition, the commission may employ part-time hearing officers, if necessary, to handle the caseload.

In all utility proceedings commenced after July 1, 1981, any hearing may be conducted by a hearing officer, who shall have authority to:

Administer oaths and affirmations;

Sign and issue subpoenas for discovery or trial;

Rule upon offers of proof;

Regulate the course of the hearing, setting the time and place for continued hearings;

Permit persons to make limited appearances as provided in Code Section 46-2-59;

Take official notice of judicially recognizable facts;

Reprimand or exclude from the hearing any person for any indecorous or improper conduct committed at or during a hearing;

Exercise such other powers necessary for the efficient and expeditious conduct of the hearing, to the end that a complete and orderly record may be developed; and

Make written findings of fact based upon evidence in the record.

The hearing officer or commission shall permit only the Commissioners, the hearing officer, the parties, or the attorneys of record of the Commissioners, hearing officers, or parties to examine or cross-examine witnesses, except with the consent of the witness.

Within 30 days after the conclusion of a hearing, the hearing officer shall prepare and certify a record of the evidence to the commission. The hearing officer shall also transmit to the commission proposed written findings of fact based upon evidence in the record. A copy of the record and findings of fact shall be provided all parties of record by the hearing officer. The hearing officer may render an initial or recommended decision in uncontested cases, if directed to do so by the commission. Any such recommended decision shall also be served upon the parties of record, who shall be provided an opportunity to file with the commission its objections or comments.

History.

Code 1933, § 93-501a, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 121, § 6; Ga. L. 1981, p. 409, § 3.

Cross references.

Procedure for contested cases in administrative proceedings generally, §

50-13-13

.

46-2-59.
Permissible parties in proceedings before commission; intervention in proceedings generally; limited appearances; procedure for granting leave to intervene.

In all proceedings before the commission, the parties to such proceeding shall consist of the affected applicant, any person who is permitted to intervene as provided in this Code section, and the Utility Finance Section established pursuant to Article 2A of this chapter.

Any person on whom a statute confers an unconditional right to intervene may intervene by filing a notice of intervention with the commission or hearing officer, as appropriate.

Any other person desiring to intervene must file an application for leave to intervene within 30 days following the first published notice of the proceeding. Any such application shall be in writing, shall be verified either by the party intervening or by his attorney on information and belief, shall identify the party requesting the intervention, and shall set forth with particularity the facts pertaining to his interest and the grounds upon which his application for intervention are based. Such application shall be served on all other parties in the proceeding, including those who have previously applied for leave to intervene. No untimely application for leave to intervene shall be granted by the presiding authority except for good cause shown.

Any party or person who has previously applied for leave to intervene in a proceeding in which leave to intervene is sought by another person may file a response to the application for leave to intervene within 15 days after the application is served.

The commission or hearing officer shall permit only the following persons to intervene:

A person upon whom a statute confers an unconditional right to intervene;

A person who demonstrates a legal, property, or other interest in the proceeding. In determining whether to permit intervention, the hearing officer may consider whether the person’s interest is adequately represented by other parties and whether the intervention will unduly delay the proceedings or prejudice the rights of other parties;

Any member of the General Assembly of the State of Georgia, who may without fee intervene on behalf of his constituents with the full rights and privileges of a designated party.

The commission or hearing officer may condition any order permitting intervention so as to assure the orderly conduct of the proceeding.

A person who is not a party may make a limited appearance by making an oral or written statement of his position on the issues within such limits and on such conditions as may be fixed by the hearing officer; but he may not otherwise participate in the proceeding.

A party granted leave to intervene shall be present, absent good cause shown, during that portion of the proceedings for which that party has indicated a desire to be heard.

An order by a hearing officer denying or conditioning an application for leave to intervene shall be immediately reviewable by the commission. An order by the commission denying or conditioning an application for leave to intervene shall be immediately reviewable as provided by law for the judicial review of final commission orders.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to prohibit the commission from taking any action prior to the expiration of the 30 day period during which persons are permitted to file applications for leave to intervene.

History.

Code 1933, § 93-502a, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 121, § 6.

Cross references.

Intervention in administrative proceedings generally, §

50-13-14

.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of administrative law, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 17 (1986).

For article, “Administrative Law,” see 63 Mercer L. Rev. 47 (2011).